Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7631.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 36-12.2 of the General Laws entitled "Medicare Enrollment" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
36-12.2-2. Medicare eligibility.
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other general or public law to the contrary, in
determining eligibility for the Qualified Medicare Beneficiary, Specified Low-Income Medicare
Beneficiary and Qualified Individual programs, described in 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(E), also
known as the Medicare Saving or Medicare Buy-In programs, the Rhode Island executive office of
health and human services (EOHHS) shall disregard all assets or resources. Implementation of this
subsection shall be contingent upon receiving federal approvals described in subsection (b) of this
section.
(b) Prior to implementing subsection (a) of this section, the EOHHS shall obtain all
required federal approvals including, amending its state plan, as necessary, and shall promulgate
regulations to implement this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004349
========